Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-1119
Violations; action to enjoin.

Whenever the director has reasonable cause to believe that any person, whether licensed or not, is violating any provision of the Burial Pre-Need Sale Act or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act, he or she may, in addition to all other actions allowed, bring an action in the district court of Lancaster County to enjoin such person from engaging in or continuing such violation or from doing any act in furtherance of such violation. In any such action, the district court may enter any order, judgment, or decree concerning temporary or permanent relief as it deems proper based upon the facts and circumstances presented to it by the director.

Laws 1986, LB 643, § 19.